Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
CHAPTER 9 Contracts for Future Delivery of Cotton, Grain, etc.

13-9-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Contract for sale” means sales, purchases, agreements of sale, agreements to sell, and agreements to purchase; and

“Person” means individuals, associations, partnerships, and corporations.

History.
Ga. L. 1929, p. 245, § 1; Code 1933, § 20-601.

13-9-2.
Requirements for valid and enforceable contracts of sale for future delivery of cotton, grain, stocks, and other items, generally; future delivery contracts where actual delivery of commodities bought or sold not contemplated declared unlawful.

All contracts of sale for future delivery of cotton, grain, stocks, or other commodities (1) made in accordance with the rules of any board of trade, exchange, or similar institution, (2) actually executed on the floor of such board of trade, exchange, or similar institution and performed or discharged according to the rules thereof, and (3) placed with or through a regular member in good standing of a cotton exchange, grain exchange, board of trade, or similar institution organized under the laws of this state or any other state shall be valid and enforceable in the courts according to their terms, provided that contracts of sale for future delivery of cotton, in order to be valid and enforceable as provided in this Code section, must not only conform to the requirements of clauses (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection, but must also be made subject to the United States Cotton Futures Act, approved August 11, 1916, and any amendments thereto; provided, further, that if this clause should for any reason be held inoperative, then contracts for future delivery of cotton shall be valid and enforceable if they conform to the requirements of clauses (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection.

All contracts as defined in Code Section 13-9-1, where it is not contemplated by a party to the contract that there shall be an actual delivery of the commodities sold or bought, shall be unlawful.

History.
Ga. L. 1929, p. 245, § 2; Code 1933, § 20-602; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 13.

13-9-3.
Contracts of sale for future delivery of cotton, grain, stocks, or other commodities, absent bona fide intention of parties as to delivery, execution of contract upon floor of exchange declared null and void; penalty for entering into or assisting entering into such contracts.

Any contract of sale for future delivery of cotton, grain, stocks, or other commodities shall be null and void and unenforceable in any court by any party thereto where it is not the bona fide intention of a party to the contract that the cotton, grain, stocks, or other commodities mentioned therein are to be delivered, but that the contract be settled according to or upon the basis of the public market quotations or prices made on any board of trade, exchange, or other similar institution, without any actual bona fide execution and the carrying out of such contract upon the floor of such exchange, board of trade, or similar institution, in accordance with the rules thereof.

Any person, either as agent or principal, who enters into or assists in making a contract of sale for the future delivery of cotton, grain, stocks, or other commodities of the nature provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be imprisoned for a period not exceeding two years.

History.
Ga. L. 1929, p. 245, §§ 3, 6; Code 1933, §§ 20-603, 20-9901.

13-9-4.
Furnishing of written statement as to location, date, and other details of execution of contract for future delivery of cotton, grain, stocks to principal for whom contract executed; effect of failure to furnish statement.

Every person shall furnish upon demand, to any principal for whom such person has executed any contract for future delivery of any cotton, grain, stocks, or other commodities, a written instrument setting forth the name and location of the exchange, board of trade, or similar institution upon which such contract has been executed, the date of the execution of the contract, and the name and address of the person with whom such contract was executed; and if such person shall refuse or neglect to furnish such statement upon reasonable demand, such refusal or neglect shall be prima-facie evidence that such contract was an illegal contract within the provisions of Code Section 13-9-3 and that the person who executed it was engaged in the maintenance and operation of a bucket shop within the provisions of Code Section 13-9-6.

History.
Ga. L. 1929, p. 245, § 5; Code 1933, § 20-605.

13-9-5.
Organization of cotton exchanges, boards of trade to receive and post quotations; adoption of rules and regulations; inspection of books.

There may be organized in any municipality voluntary associations to be known as cotton exchanges, boards of trade, or similar institutions, to receive and post quotations on cotton, grain, stocks, or other commodities for the benefit of the members or other persons engaged in the production of cotton, grain, stocks, or other commodities. Such associations shall adopt a uniform set of rules and regulations not incompatible with the laws of this state and of the United States. Such associations shall open their books to inspection by all proper courts and officers when required to do so.

History.
Ga. L. 1929, p. 245, § 7; Code 1933, § 20-606.

13-9-6.
Maintenance or operation of bucket shop.

As used in this Code section, the term “bucket shop” means any place of business in which contracts of the nature provided for in Code Section 13-9-3 are made.

The maintenance or operation of a bucket shop is prohibited.

Any person, either as agent or principal, who maintains or operates a bucket shop shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be imprisoned for a period not exceeding two years.

History.
Ga. L. 1929, p. 245, §§ 4, 6; Code 1933, §§ 20-604, 20-9901.

13-9-7.
Effect of conflict between provisions of chapter and Uniform Commercial Code.

In the event of a conflict between this chapter and Title 11, the “Uniform Commercial Code,” the Uniform Commercial Code shall control.